src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON 970
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>å # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>åa # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>ær # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>ærne # ;

LEXICON 971
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>å # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>åa # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>jæer # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>jæene # ;

LEXICON 972
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>ku # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>kua # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>kyr # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>kyrne # ;

LEXICON 974
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>o # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>oa # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>eer # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>eene # ;

LEXICON 977
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>å # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>åa # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>æer # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>æene # ;

LEXICON 978
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>o # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>oa # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>aer # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>aene # ;

LEXICON 979
 +Fem+Sg+Indef:%>a # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%>aa # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>jeer # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>jeene # ;

LEXICON 980
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%>er # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Def:%>ene # ;

LEXICON 981
 +Fem+Pl+Indef:%> # ;

LEXICON 982
 +Fem+Sg+Def:%> # ;

LEXICON 989
 +Fem:%> # ;

LEXICON 991
 +Pl+Indef:%>er # ;
 +Pl+Def:%>ene # ;

LEXICON 992
 +Pl+Indef:%> # ;
