src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot
ammeku+N:ammek 972 ; ! LEMMA_ID=127291
callgirl+N:callgirl 989 ; ! LEMMA_ID=124119
forku+N:fork 972 ; ! LEMMA_ID=135397
hermegås+N:hermeg 971 ; ! LEMMA_ID=128361
pinupgirl+N:pinupgirl 989 ; ! LEMMA_ID=124139
sineku+N:sinek 972 ; ! LEMMA_ID=136611
tamgås+N:tamg 971 ; ! LEMMA_ID=137078
villgås+N:villg 971 ; ! LEMMA_ID=131367
